Utah statutes.
31A-22-501.1.   Employer groups.

(1)  The lives of a group of individuals may be insured under a policy:

(a)  issued as a policyholder, to:

(i)  an employer; or

(ii)  an employer sponsored trust for the benefit of the employer's employees;

(b)  having an insurable interest as stated in Subsection 31A-21-104(3)(d); and

(c)  subject to the requirement of Subsection 31A-21-104(3)(d)(v).

(2)  A policy issued under this section is not subject to:

(a)  Section 31A-21-311; and

(b)  Sections 31A-22-516 through 31A-22-522.



Amended by Chapter 263, 2008 General Session

